Arkansas statutes. Title 7 Elections
Chapter 5 Election Procedure Generally
7-5-305. Requirements.

(a)

Before a person is permitted to vote, the poll worker shall:

(1)

Request the voter to identify himself or herself in order to verify the existence of his or her name on the precinct voter registration list;

(2)

Request the voter, in the presence of the poll worker, to state his or her address and state his or her date of birth;

(3)

Determine that the voter's date of birth and address are the same as those on the precinct voter registration list;

(4)

If the date of birth given by the voter is not the same as that on the precinct voter registration list, request the voter to provide identification as the poll worker deems appropriate;

(5)(A)

If the voter's address is not the same as that on the precinct voter registration list, verify with the county clerk that the address is within the precinct.

(B)

If the address is within the precinct, request the voter to complete a voter registration application form for the purpose of updating county voter registration record files.

(C)

If the address is not within the precinct:

(i)

Verify with the county clerk's office the proper precinct; and

(ii)

Instruct the voter to go to the polling site serving that precinct in order for his or her vote to be counted;

(6)

If the voter's name is not the same as that on the precinct voter registration list, request the voter to complete a voter registration application form for purposes of updating county voter registration record files;

(7)

Request the voter, in the presence of the poll worker, to sign his or her name, including the given name, middle name or initial, if any, and last name in the space provided on the precinct voter registration list. If a person is unable to sign his or her signature or make his or her mark or cross, the poll worker shall enter his or her initials and the voter's date of birth in the space for the person's signature on the precinct voter registration list;

(8)(A)

Except as provided in this section, request that the voter present verification of voter registration by providing a document or identification card that meets the requirements of Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 51, § 13, if required by that section.

(B)(i)

If a voter is unable to present verification of voter registration in the form of a document or identification card required by Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 51, § 13, the poll worker shall:

(a)

Indicate on the precinct voter registration list that the voter did not present verification of voter registration by providing a document or identification card required by Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 51, § 13; and

(b)

Permit the voter to cast a provisional ballot.

(ii)

When a voter is unable to provide verification of voter registration, the voter and the election official shall follow the procedure under Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 51, § 13.

(iii)

A first-time voter who registers by mail without providing identification when registering and desires to vote in person but who does not meet the identification requirements of §7-5-201(e) may cast a provisional ballot.

(iv)

Following each election, the county board of election commissioners may review the precinct voter registration lists and may provide the information of the voters not presenting verification of voter registration at the polls to the prosecuting attorney.

(v)

The county board of election commissioners shall refer suspected instances of voter fraud to the prosecuting attorney.

(vi)

The prosecuting attorney may investigate possible voter fraud;

(9)

Record the voter's name or request the voter to print his or her name on the list-of-voters form;

(10)

Follow the procedures under §§7-5-310 and7-5-311 if the person is a voter with a disability and presents himself or herself to vote; and

(11)

Permit the person to cast a provisional ballot if the person received an absentee ballot according to the precinct voter registration list.

(b)

A person not listed on the precinct voter registration list may vote only in accordance with §7-5-306.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 7, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-708; Acts 1993, No. 487, § 2; 1995, No. 946, § 6; 1995, No. 963, § 6; 1997, No. 451, § 18; 1999, No. 1454, § 1; 2001, No. 471, § 1; 2003, No. 994, § 4; 2003, No. 1308, § 4; 2005, No. 238, § 1; 2005, No. 2193, § 2; 2007, No. 1020, § 8; 2009, No. 959, § 11; 2013, No. 595, § 4; 2017, No. 633, § 6.

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment substituted “poll worker” for “election official” throughout the section; deleted “or confirm” following “state” in (a)(2); and substituted “§§7-5-310 and7-5-311” for “§§7-5-310,7-5-311, and7-5-523 [Repealed]” in (a)(10); and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2013 amendment rewrote (a)(8).

The 2017 amendment rewrote (a)(8).

Cross References.

Voter registration application forms, Ark. Const. Amend. 51, § 6.

7-5-306. Procedure when voter's name is not on the precinct voter registration list.

(a)

If the voter's name is not on the precinct voter registration list, the poll worker shall permit the voter to vote only under the following conditions:

(1)

The voter identifies himself or herself by stating his or her name and date of birth and is verified by the county clerk as a registered voter within the county and, if the county is divided into more than one (1) congressional district, within the same congressional district;

(2)

The voter gives and affirms his or her current residence and the poll worker verifies with the county clerk that the voter's residence is within the precinct;

(3)

The voter completes an updated voter registration application form; and

(4)

The voter signs the precinct voter registration list.

(b)

If the voter is not listed on the precinct voter registration list and the poll worker is unable to verify the voter's registration with the county clerk and the voter contends that he or she is a registered voter in the precinct in which he or she desires to vote and that he or she is eligible to vote, then the voter shall be permitted to cast a provisional ballot.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 7, § 9; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-709; Acts 1995, No. 946, § 7; 1995, No. 963, § 7; 1997, No. 451, § 19; 2003, No. 994, § 5; 2005, No. 238, § 2; 2007, No. 224, § 2; 2009, No. 959, § 12.

Amendments.

The 2007 amendment deleted “as follows” at the end of the introductory paragraph of (b); and deleted former (b)(1) through (b)(4) and (c).

The 2009 amendment substituted “poll worker” for “election official” in three places.

7-5-307. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning election official's initials, was repealed by Acts 2007, No. 224, § 3. The section was derived from Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 7, § 10; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-710; Acts 1995, No. 461, § 2; 1997, No. 451, § 20; 2005, No. 880, § 1.

7-5-308. Provisional ballot procedure.

(a)

Except as provided under subsection (b) of this section, if a voter is required by law to cast a provisional ballot, the provisional ballot shall be cast pursuant to the following procedures:

(1)

A poll worker shall notify the voter that the voter may cast a provisional ballot in that election;

(2)

The voter shall execute a written eligibility affirmation under penalty of perjury in the presence of the poll worker stating that he or she is a registered voter in the precinct in which he or she desires to vote and is eligible to vote;

(3)

Unless a provisional ballot is cast using a ballot marking device, the poll worker shall initial the back of the provisional ballot, remove the provisional ballot stub from the provisional ballot, and place the stub in the stub box provided;

(4)

The voter shall mark his or her provisional ballot;

(5)

The voter shall place the voted provisional ballot in a provisional ballot secrecy envelope marked “provisional ballot” and seal the envelope;

(6)

The voter shall place the sealed provisional ballot envelope containing the voted provisional ballot in a voter envelope, seal the envelope, and give it to the poll worker;

(7)

The poll worker shall provide the voter written information instructing him or her on how to determine whether his or her provisional ballot was counted, and if not, the reason the provisional ballot was not counted; and

(8)

The poll worker shall make a separate list of the names and addresses of all persons voting a provisional ballot under this subsection, and each person voting a provisional ballot shall sign his or her name to this list.

(b)

If a voter is required by law to cast a provisional ballot because the voter is unable to verify his or her registration by providing a document or identification card that meets the requirements of Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 51, § 13, the provisional ballot shall be cast pursuant to the following procedures:

(1)

The poll worker shall indicate on the precinct voter registration list that the voter did not present a required document or identification card;

(2)

The poll worker shall notify the voter that the voter may cast a provisional ballot in that election;

(3)

The voter shall execute a written eligibility affirmation under penalty of perjury in the presence of the poll worker stating that he or she is a registered voter in the precinct in which he or she desires to vote and is eligible to vote;

(4)(A)

The poll worker shall inform the voter that the voter may complete a sworn statement stating that the voter is registered to vote in this state and that he or she is the person who is registered to vote.

(B)

A sworn statement completed under subdivision (b)(4)(A) of this section is not required to be notarized, but the voter shall execute the sworn statement under penalty of perjury.

(C)

The sworn statement under subdivision (b)(4)(A) of this section shall be delivered to the county board of election commissioners so that the provisional ballot may be counted under subsection (f) of this section;

(5)

Unless a provisional ballot is cast using a ballot marking device, the poll worker shall initial the back of the provisional ballot, remove the provisional ballot stub from the provisional ballot, and place the stub in the stub box provided;

(6)

The voter shall mark his or her provisional ballot;

(7)

The voter shall place the voted provisional ballot in a provisional ballot secrecy envelope marked “provisional ballot” and seal the envelope;

(8)

The voter shall place the sealed provisional ballot envelope containing the voted provisional ballot in a voter envelope, seal the envelope, and give it to the poll worker;

(9)

The poll worker shall provide the voter written information instructing him or her on how to determine whether his or her provisional ballot was counted, and if not, the reason the ballot was not counted; and

(10)

The poll worker shall make a separate list of the names and addresses of all persons voting a provisional ballot under this subsection, and each person voting a provisional ballot shall sign his or her name to this list.

(c)

The poll worker shall preserve, secure, and separate all provisional ballots under subsections (a) and (b) of this section from the remaining ballots so that the right of any person to vote may be determined later by the county board of election commissioners or the court in which an election contest may be filed.

(d)(1)

Whenever a person casts a provisional ballot under this section, the poll worker shall provide the voter written information that states that the individual who casts a provisional ballot will be able to ascertain whether the provisional vote was counted, and if not, the reason the provisional vote was not counted.

(2)

The Secretary of State shall establish a free access system to allow a provisional voter under this section to ascertain whether his or her provisional vote was counted, and if not, the reason his or her provisional vote was not counted.

(3)

Access to information about an individual provisional ballot shall be restricted to the voter who cast the provisional ballot.

(e)(1)

Before certification of the results of the election, the county board of election commissioners shall determine whether the provisional ballots are valid.

(2)

Unless enjoined by a court of competent jurisdiction, a provisional ballot under subsection (a) of this section shall be counted if:

(A)

It is cast by a registered voter and is the correct ballot, according to the precinct listed on the voter's eligibility affirmation, for the precinct of the voter's residence; and

(B)

The county board of election commissioners does not determine that the provisional ballot is invalid and should not be counted based on other grounds.

(f)

Unless enjoined by a court of competent jurisdiction, a provisional ballot under subsection (b) of this section shall be counted if:

(1)(A)

The voter completes a sworn statement at the polling site when voting either early or at the polls on election day stating that the voter is registered to vote in this state and that he or she is the person registered to vote; and

(B)

The county board of election commissioners does not determine that the provisional ballot is invalid and should not be counted based on other grounds; or

(2)(A)

The voter returns to the county board of election commissioners or the county clerk by 12:00 noon on the Monday following the election and presents a document or identification card that complies with the requirements of Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 51, § 13; and

(B)

The county board of election commissioners does not determine that the provisional ballot is invalid and should not be counted based on other grounds.

(g)

If, upon examination of a provisional ballot under this section, the county board of election commissioners suspects that a violation of the election laws has occurred, the county board of election commissioners may refer the matter to the prosecuting attorney.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 7, § 12; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-712; Acts 2007, No. 224, § 4; 2009, No. 1480, § 25; 2017, No. 633, § 7; 2019, No. 109, §§ 1, 2.

Amendments.

The 2007 amendment substituted “Provisional ballot procedure” for “Ballots to remain in polling place” in the section heading, and rewrote the section.

The 2009 amendment substituted “poll worker” for “election official” and variants throughout; rewrote (c); deleted former (d) and redesignated the remaining subsections accordingly; and rewrote (d).

The 2017 amendment, in the introductory language of (a), substituted “Except as provided under subsection (b) of this section, if a” for “When the” and inserted “provisional” following “the”; deleted “individual” preceding “voter” twice in (a)(1); inserted “under penalty of perjury” in (a)(2); inserted “provisional” preceding the first two occurrences of “ballot” in (a)(3); inserted “provisional” preceding “ballot secrecy envelope” in (a)(5); inserted “provisional” preceding the second occurrence of “ballot” in (a)(7); added “under this subsection . . . to this list” at the end of (a)(8); inserted present (b); redesignated former (b)-(d) as present (c)-(e); inserted “under subsections (a) and (b) of this section” in (c); in (d)(1) and (d)(2), inserted “under this section” and substituted “provisional vote” for “vote” twice; substituted “voter who cast the provisional ballot” for “individual who cast the ballot” in (d)(3); inserted “under subsection (a) of this section” in the introductory language of (e)(2); added (e)(2)(B); inserted (f); redesignated former (e) as (g); in (g), substituted “a provisional ballot under this section” for “any provisional ballots” and inserted “of election commissioners”; and made stylistic changes.

The 2019 amendment added “Unless a provisional ballot is cast using a ballot marking device” in (a)(3) and (b)(5).

7-5-309. Voting procedure.

(a)

Before giving the voter a preprinted paper ballot, a poll worker shall:

(1)

Initial the back of the ballot;

(2)

Remove the ballot stub; and

(3)

Place the stub into the stub box provided.

(b)(1)(A)

Upon receiving his or her ballot, the voter may mark the ballot appropriately at a voting booth, voting machine, or private voting place that allows for the voter to mark the ballot in secrecy so that no one may view how he or she voted.

(B)

A voter shall not be allowed more than ten (10) minutes to mark his or her ballot.

(2)

The voter or the voter's authorized assistant shall deposit the marked ballot into the ballot box provided.

(c)

The voter shall not be required to sign, initial, or in any way identify himself or herself with the ballot, the ballot stub, or the list of voters other than in the manner provided in this section.

(d)

[Repealed.]

(e)

After having voted or having declined to vote, the voter shall immediately depart from the polling site.

(f)

A person shall not carry a ballot outside of the polling place.

(g)(1)

If a paper ballot is left in the polling site outside of the ballot box after the voter has departed, a poll worker shall:

(A)

Write “Abandoned” on the face of the paper ballot;

(B)

Place the paper ballot into an envelope marked “Abandoned Ballot”;

(C)

Note in writing on the outside of the envelope the circumstances surrounding the abandoned ballot; and

(D)

Preserve the abandoned ballot separately.

(2)

The county board of election commissioners shall not count the ballot.

(h)(1)

If an electronic vote tabulating device at the polling site has rejected a ballot that remains in the receiving part of the device, two (2) poll workers shall override warnings on the device and complete the process of casting the ballot only if:

(A)

The voter has departed the polling site; and

(B)

The voter did not indicate that he or she chose to cancel or replace the ballot.

(2)

The poll workers shall document:

(A)

The time;

(B)

The name of the voter;

(C)

The names of the poll workers completing the process of casting the ballot; and

(D)

All other circumstances surrounding the abandoned ballot.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 7, § 11; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-711; Acts 1997, No. 451, § 21; 2005, No. 880, § 2; 2007, No. 224, § 5; 2007, No. 834, § 1; 2009, No. 959, § 13; 2011, No. 1033, § 1; 2013, No. 1424, § 1; 2013, No. 1461, § 1; 2017, No. 908, § 1; 2019, No. 109, § 3; 2019, No. 534, § 1; 2019, No. 664, § 1.

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment substituted “poll worker” for “election official,” “election officer,” or variant throughout the section; substituted “judge” for “officials” in (a)(4); and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2011 amendment substituted “voting booths for each polling site in a number deemed appropriate by the county board of election commissioners” for “in each polling site at least one (1) voting booth for each fifty (50) registered electors voting in the last preceding comparable election” in (a)(1).

The 2013 amendment by No. 1424 rewrote (a)(4), (c)(1)(A), and (c)(2); and inserted “or the voter's authorized assistant” in the introductory language of (g)(1) and in (h)(1).

The 2013 amendment by No. 1461 deleted former (a) and redesignated former (b), (c), (d)(1), and (d)(2) as present (a), (b), (c), and (d) respectively; substituted “appropriately” for “by placing an appropriate mark” in (b)(1)(A); in (b)(2), substituted “or the voter’s authorized assistant shall” for “shall then personally” and inserted “marked”; substituted “provided” for “set forth” in (c); substituted “declined to vote” for “having declined to do so” in (e); deleted “be permitted to” preceding “carry” in (f); and rewrote the introductory language of (g)(1) and (h)(1).

The 2017 amendment, in (b)(1)(A), substituted “may mark the ballot” for “shall proceed to mark it” and added “at a voting booth, voting machine, or private voting place that allows for the voter to mark the ballot in secrecy so that no one may view how he or she voted”.

The 2019 amendment by No. 109 inserted “preprinted paper” in the introductory language of (a).

The 2019 amendment by No. 534 repealed (d).

The 2019 amendment by No. 664 substituted “ten (10) minutes” for “five (5) minutes” in (b)(1)(B).

7-5-310. Privacy — Assistance to voters with disabilities.

(a)(1)

Each voter shall be provided the privacy to mark his or her ballot. Privacy shall be provided by the poll workers at each polling site or by the county clerk, if the county clerk conducts early voting, to ensure that a voter desiring privacy is not singled out.

(2)(A)

In a county that uses paper ballots, the county board of election commissioners shall determine and provide the appropriate number of voting booths for each polling site.

(B)

A voting booth shall be:

(i)

Constructed to permit the voter to prepare his or her ballot while screened from observation;

(ii)

Furnished with supplies and conveniences that will enable the voter to prepare his or her ballot; and

(iii)

Situated in the plain view of a poll worker.

(C)

If a person is not a poll worker and is not casting a ballot, he or she shall not be within six feet (6') of the voting booths, unless:

(i)

The person is authorized by an election judge; and

(ii)

The person's presence is necessary to keep order or enforce the law.

(3)

A person may not enter a polling site on election day during voting hours unless the person is:

(A)

An election official;

(B)

An authorized poll watcher;

(C)

A voter present to cast his or her ballot;

(D)

A person in the care of a voter if the person:

(i)

Does not disrupt or interfere with the normal voting procedures; and

(ii)

Is not eligible to vote in that election;

(E)

A person lawfully assisting the voter;

(F)

A law enforcement officer or emergency service personnel who are acting in the line of duty;

(G)

A monitor authorized by the State Board of Election Commissioners or observer authorized by a federal agency with the authority to place the observer at the polling site;

(H)(i)

A person with business in the polling site that is not connected to the election.

(ii)

A person with business in the polling site that is not connected to the election shall remain outside of the voter processing area or voting room except to pass through or by the voter processing area or voting room without speaking to a voter or an election official and with the purpose to conduct his or her business;

(I)

A person whom the county clerk or the county board of election commissioners has authorized to assist in conducting the election;

(J)

A person authorized by the State Board of Election Commissioners or the county board of election commissioners; or

(K)

The county clerk.

(b)(1)

A voter shall inform the poll workers at the time that the voter presents himself or herself to vote that he or she is unable to mark or cast the ballot without help and needs assistance in casting or marking his or her ballot.

(2)

The voter shall be directed to a voting machine equipped for use by persons with disabilities by which he or she may elect to cast his or her ballot without assistance, or the voter may request assistance with either the paper ballot or the voting machine, depending on the voting system in use for the election, by:

(A)

Two (2) poll workers; or

(B)

A person named by the voter.

(3)

If the voter is assisted by two (2) poll workers, one (1) of the poll workers shall observe the voting process and one (1) may assist the voter in marking and casting the ballot according to the wishes of the voter without comment or interpretation.

(4)(A)(i)

If the voter is assisted by one (1) person named by the voter, he or she may assist the voter in marking and casting the ballot according to the wishes of the voter without any comment or interpretation.

(ii)

If an election official witnesses the person assisting the voter commenting or interpreting in violation of subdivision (b)(4)(A)(i) of this section:

(a)

The election official may cause the person assisting the voter to be removed from the polling site; and

(b)

If the voter requests additional assistance in marking and casting his or her ballot, it may be provided by two (2) election officials trained to do so.

(B)

No person other than the following shall assist more than six (6) voters in marking and casting a ballot at an election:

(i)

A poll worker;

(ii)

The county clerk during early voting; or

(iii)

A deputy county clerk during early voting.

(C)

If the person whose assistance has been requested by the voter is a candidate on the ballot:

(i)

The candidate shall not assist more than six (6) voters in the election; and

(ii)

The candidate may only assist a voter who is related to the candidate within the second degree of consanguinity.

(5)

It shall be the duty of the poll workers at the polling site to make and maintain a list of the names and addresses of all persons assisting voters.

(c)

Any voter who, because of physical, sensory, or other disability, presents himself or herself for voting and then informs a poll worker at the polling site that he or she is unable to stand in line for extended periods of time shall be entitled to and assisted by a poll worker to advance to the head of any line of voters then waiting in line to vote at the polling site.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 908, § 1; 1995, No. 1296, § 39; 1997, No. 451, § 22; 2003, No. 1308, § 1; 2005, No. 2233, § 6; 2007, No. 1020, § 7; 2009, No. 658, § 3; 2009, No. 959, § 14; 2013, No. 1461, § 2; 2019, No. 965, § 1.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

As amended by Acts 1993, No. 1192, § 1, §7-5-310 also provided, in part, that the section shall become null and void on January 1, 1995, and thus the section expired on that date. That version of §7-5-310 was derived from Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 7, § 13; 1985, No. 1025, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-713, Acts 1987, No. 702, § 1; 1993, No. 513, § 1; 1993, No. 1192, § 1.

Acts 1995, No. 908, § 1, which became effective July 28, 1995, purported to amend §7-5-310, which was expired, and set out the section in a form identical to the section as it existed when it expired. Acts 1995, No. 1296, § 39, repealed §7-5-310 because it had expired, but pursuant to the provisions of Acts 1995, No. 1296, § 100, the amendment of § 7-5-310 by Acts 1995, No. 908, was deemed to supersede its repeal by Acts 1995, No. 1296, § 39.

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment by No. 658 inserted (b)(4)(B).

The 2009 amendment by No. 959 rewrote (a).

The 2013 amendment added (a)(2) and (3).

The 2019 amendment rewrote (a)(2)(A); inserted “while” in (a)(2)(B)(i); substituted “polling site” for “polling place” throughout (a)(3); in (a)(3)(H)(ii), inserted “voter processing area or” twice and inserted “without speaking to a voter or an election official and”; inserted “county clerk or the” in (a)(3)(I); added (a)(3)(K); inserted “or marking” in (b)(1); added the (b)(4)(A)(i) designation; added (b)(4)(A)(ii); added (b)(4)(C); and made stylistic changes.

7-5-311. Voters with disabilities — Special procedures — Definition.

(a)

The county boards of election commissioners shall provide voting locations that are accessible to voters with disabilities and shall provide reasonable and adequate methods whereby voters with disabilities may personally and secretly execute their ballots at the polling places.

(b)

After conferring with and obtaining the assistance of persons with disabilities or organizations of citizens with disabilities, the State Board of Election Commissioners shall offer to assist local election authorities with the implementation of Title II requirements of the Americans with Disabilities Act and with the Title III requirements of the Help America Vote Act of 2002 regarding accessibility for voters with disabilities.

(c)

As used in this section, the term “disability” means any physical, mental, or sensory impairment.

(d)(1)

The county board of election commissioners shall be responsible for compliance with this section and with Pub. L. No. 98-435, Title II of Pub. L. No. 101-336, the Americans with Disabilities Act, and the Help America Vote Act of 2002 regarding the accessibility of voting locations for voters with disabilities.

(2)

The State Board of Election Commissioners shall mail to the chair of each county board of election commissioners and the chair of each county political party a copy of this section and of Pub. L. No. 98-435.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 972, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-721; Acts 1989, No. 912, § 2; 1993, No. 1192, § 3; 1995, No. 1120, § 1; 1999, No. 643, §§ 1, 2; 2003, No. 1308, § 2; 2005, No. 1827, § 4; 2007, No. 1020, § 9.

Amendments.

The 2007 amendment deleted “with respect to general, special, and primary elections under their several jurisdictions” following “commissioners” in (a); substituted “mail to” for “provide” in (d)(2); and deleted former (d)(2)(B).

U.S. Code.

Pub. L. No. 98-435, referred to in this section, is codified as 52 U.S.C. § 20101 et seq.

Title II of Pub. L. No. 101-336, referred to in this section, is codified as 42 U.S.C. § 12131 et seq. The Americans with Disabilities Act is codified primarily as 42 U.S.C. § 12101 et seq.

The federal Help America Vote Act of 2002, referred to in this section, is codified as 52 U.S.C. § 20901 et seq.

7-5-312. Challenge of voter's ballot by poll watchers, candidates, or designees.

(a)

Poll watchers shall include any:

(1)

Candidate in person, but only during the counting and tabulation of ballots and the processing of absentee ballots;

(2)

Authorized representative of a candidate;

(3)

Authorized representative of a group seeking the passage or defeat of a measure on the ballot; and

(4)

Authorized representative of a political party with a candidate on the ballot.

(b)

Each candidate, group, or party may have at any given time during the election, including early voting:

(1)

One (1) authorized representative present at any one (1) time at each location within a polling site where voters identify themselves to election officials, so as to observe and ascertain the identity of those persons presenting themselves to vote for the purpose of challenging voters; and

(2)

One (1) authorized representative present at any one (1) time at each location within the absentee ballot processing site where absentee ballots are processed, so as to observe and ascertain the identity of absentee voters for the purpose of challenging any absentee vote.

(c)

In accordance with §§7-5-316,7-5-413,7-5-416,7-5-527, and7-5-615, a candidate in person or an authorized representative of a candidate or political party may be present at a polling site, central counting location, and absentee ballot counting location for the purpose of witnessing the counting of ballots by election officials and determining whether ballots are fairly and accurately counted.

(d)

The document designating and authorizing a representative of a candidate, a representative of a group seeking the passage or defeat of a measure on the ballot, and a representative of a political party with a candidate on the ballot shall be filed with the county clerk and a file-marked copy shall be presented by the poll watcher to the election official immediately upon entering the polling site, absentee ballot processing site, or counting location in the following form:

“POLL WATCHER AUTHORIZATION FORM Representative of a Candidate I,
, state that I am a candidate for the office of
in the
election. I further state that I have designated
as my authorized representative at the election at polling sites
and absentee ballot processing sites
in
County, Arkansas, to observe and ascertain the identity of persons presenting themselves to vote in person or by absentee for the purpose of challenging any voter in accordance with Arkansas Code §§7-5-312,7-5-416, and7-5-417. I further state that I have designated and authorized my representative named above to be present at the ballot counting locations at
in
County, Arkansas, for the purpose of witnessing the counting of ballots by election officials and determining whether ballots are fairly and accurately counted in accordance with Arkansas Code §§7-5-312,7-5-316,7-5-413,7-5-416,7-5-527, and7-5-615. Representative of a Group I,
, state that I represent the
group that is seeking passage/defeat (circle one) of the ballot measure entitled
on the ballot in the
election at polling sites
and absentee ballot processing sites
in
County, Arkansas, to observe and ascertain the identity of persons presenting themselves to vote in person or by absentee for the purpose of challenging any voter in accordance with Arkansas Code §§ 7-5-312, 7-5-416, and7-5-417. Representative of a Party I,
, state that I am the chair or secretary of the state/county (circle one) committee for the
party with candidates on the ballot in the
election. I further state that I have designated
as an authorized party representative at the election at polling sites
and absentee ballot processing sites
in
County, Arkansas, to observe and ascertain the identity of persons presenting themselves to vote in person or by absentee for the purpose of challenging any voter in accordance with Arkansas Code §§ 7-5-312, 7-5-416, and 7-5-417. I further state that I have designated and authorized my representative named above to be present at the ballot counting locations at
in
County, Arkansas, for the purpose of witnessing the counting of ballots by election officials and determining whether ballots are fairly and accurately counted in accordance with Arkansas Code §§ 7-5-312,7-5-316,7-5-413, 7-5-416,7-5-527, and7-5-615.
Signature of Candidate, Group Representative, or Chair/Secretary of the State/County Committee Acknowledged before me this
day of
, 20 Notary Public:
My Commission Expires:
I do hereby state that I am familiar with the rights and responsibilities of a poll watcher as outlined on the back of the poll watcher authorization form and will in good faith comply with the provisions of same.
Signature of the Poll Watcher Acknowledged before me this
day of
, 20 Notary Public:
My Commission Expires:
I do hereby acknowledge the filing of this poll watcher authorization form with the county clerk's office.
Signature of County Clerk”.

Click to view form.

(e)

Poll watcher rights and responsibilities shall be printed on the back of the document in the following form:

“POLL WATCHER RIGHTS AND RESPONSIBILITIES

A poll watcher may be:

(1)

A candidate in person, but only during the counting and tabulation of ballots and the processing of absentee ballots;

(2)

An authorized representative of a candidate;

(3)

An authorized representative of a group seeking the passage or defeat of a measure on the ballot; or

(4)

An authorized representative of a party with a candidate on the ballot.

Official recognition of poll watchers:

(1)

Only one (1) authorized poll watcher per candidate, group, or party at any one (1) given time may be officially recognized as a poll watcher at each location within a polling site where voters identify themselves to election officials;

(2)

Only one (1) authorized poll watcher per candidate, group, or party at any one (1) given time may be officially recognized as a poll watcher at each location within the absentee ballot processing site where absentee ballots are processed; and

(3)

Only one (1) authorized poll watcher per candidate or party at any one (1) given time may be officially recognized as a poll watcher at the counting of the ballots.

Poll watcher credentials:

(1)

Except for candidates in person, poll watchers must present a valid affidavit in the form of a ‘Poll Watcher Authorization Form’ to an election official immediately upon entering the polling or counting location; and

(2)

Candidates in person attending a counting site or absentee ballot processing site are not required to present a ‘Poll Watcher Authorization Form’ but must present some form of identification to an election official immediately upon entering the site for the purpose of confirming the poll watcher as a candidate on the ballot.

Poll watchers may:

(1)

Observe the election officials;

(2)

Stand close enough to the place where voters check in to vote so as to hear the voter's name;

(3)

Compile lists of persons voting;

(4)

Challenge ballots upon notification to an election official before the voter signs the precinct voter registration list and upon completing a ‘Challenged Ballot Form’;

(5)

Call to the attention of the election sheriff any occurrence believed to be an irregularity or violation of election law. The poll watcher may not discuss the occurrence unless the election sheriff invites the discussion; and

(6)

Be present at the opening, processing, and canvassing of absentee ballots for the purpose of challenging absentee votes in the manner provided by law for personal voting challenges.

Poll watchers representing a candidate or political party may:

(1)

Remain at the polling site after the poll closes if ballots are counted at the poll;

(2)

Be present at the counting of votes by hand or by an electronic vote tabulating device at a central location;

(3)

Be present at the counting of absentee ballots for the purpose of witnessing the counting of ballots by election officials and determining whether ballots are fairly and accurately counted; and

(4)

Upon request made to an election official, inspect any or all ballots at the time the ballots are being counted.

Poll watchers may not:

(1)

Be within six feet (6') of any voting machine or booth used by voters to cast their ballot;

(2)

Speak to any voter or in any way attempt to influence a voter inside the polling site or within one hundred feet (100') of the primary exterior entrance used by voters to the building containing the polling site; or

(3)

Disrupt the orderly conduct of the election.”

(f)

Poll watcher rights and responsibilities shall be posted in plain view at each polling site, absentee ballot processing site, and counting site.

(g)

A poll watcher may challenge a voter only on the grounds that the voter is not eligible to vote in the precinct or that the voter has previously voted at that election.

(h)(1)

When the ballot of any voter is thus challenged, it shall be treated as a provisional ballot.

(2)

The poll watcher shall notify an election official of the challenge before the voter signs the precinct voter registration list.

(3)

The poll watcher shall complete a challenged ballot form.

(4)

The election official shall inform the voter that his or her ballot is being challenged.

(5)

The procedures for casting a provisional ballot under §7-5-308 shall be followed.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 7, § 14; 1977, No. 114, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-714; Acts 1987, No. 247, § 2; 1987, No. 905, § 1; 1991, No. 407, § 1; 1991, No. 529, § 1; 1997, No. 451, § 23; 2003, No. 994, § 6; 2003, No. 1154, § 1; 2005, No. 67, § 8; 2005, No. 880, § 3; 2007, No. 224, § 6; 2009, No. 1480, § 26.

Amendments.

The 2007 amendment rewrote the section.

The 2009 amendment rewrote (a)(1); substituted “voters” for “any voter who appears for the purpose of casting a ballot” in (b)(1); in the “POLL WATCHER RIGHTS AND RESPONSIBILITIES” form in (e), rewrote (1) following “A poll wathcher may be,” rewrote (2) following “Poll watcher credentials” and “Poll watchers may,” deleted (2) following “Poll watchers may not” and redesignated (3) and (4) as (2) and (3); inserted present (g) and redesignated (g) as (h).

7-5-313. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning cancellation and return of spoiled ballots, was repealed by Acts 2009, No. 1480, § 27. The section was derived from Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 7, § 12; A.S.A. 1947, § 3-712; Acts 1997, No. 451, § 24.